Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-507
Museums; funds; disbursement; acquisition from private sources; kept separate and apart; manner of disbursement.

All taxes levied or collected shall be kept for the use of the museum, separate and apart from other funds of the city, village, county, or township. They shall be drawn upon and paid out by the treasurer of such city, village, county, or township upon vouchers signed by the president of the museum board and authenticated by the secretary of such board, and shall not be used or disbursed for any other purpose or in any other manner. All funds donated or in any other way acquired from private sources, including paid memberships in a local museum association, for the erection, maintenance, or support of any museum shall be kept for the use of the museum, separate and apart from all other funds of the city, village, county or township. They shall be drawn upon and paid out by the treasurer of such museum board upon vouchers signed by the president of the museum board and authenticated by the secretary of such board, and shall not be used or disbursed for any other purpose or in any other manner.

Laws 1957, c. 224, § 7, p. 769;

Laws 1963, c. 306, § 4, p. 905.